Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-918
Definitions; where found.

For purposes of sections 85-917 to 85-966, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 85-919 to 85-932.01 shall be used.

Laws 1978, LB 756, § 2;

Laws 1993, LB 239, § 8.